West Virginia, session 2025, HB3424.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4.  CORRECTIONS MANAGEMENT. §15A-4-21. Director of employment; director of housing; released inmates; duties. The commissioner may employ or contract for a Director of Employment and a Director of Housing for released inmates. The Director of Employment shall work with federal, state, county, and local government and private entities to negotiate agreements which facilitate employment opportunities for released inmates. The Director of Housing shall work with federal, state, county, and local government and private entities to negotiate agreements which facilitate housing opportunities for released inmates. The Director of Employment shall investigate job opportunities and give every possible assistance in helping released inmates find employment. The Director of Housing shall work in conjunction with the Bureau of Community Corrections and the Parole Board to reduce release delays due to lack of a home plan and develop community housing resources. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home